Nebraska statutes.
Revised Statutes Supplement, 201160-520
Judgments; payments
sufficient to satisfy requirements.

Judgments in
excess of the amounts specified in subdivision (12) of
section 60-501 shall, for the purpose of the Motor Vehicle Safety Responsibility
Act only, be deemed satisfied when payments in the amounts so specified have
been credited thereon. Payments made in settlement of any claims because of
bodily injury, death, or property damage arising from a motor vehicle accident
shall be credited in reduction of the respective amounts so specified.

Laws 1949, c. 178, § 20, p. 492;

Laws 2010, LB650, § 33;

Laws 2011, LB289, § 27.